Washington statutes.
RCW 36.86.030

Amendment of standards—Filing.

Road and bridge standards may be amended from time to time by resolution of the county legislative authority, but no standard may be approved by the legislative authority with any minimum requirement less than that specified in this chapter. Two copies of the approved standards shall be filed with the department of transportation for its use in examinations of county road work.

[ 1984 c 7 s 39; 1963 c 4 s 36.86.030. Prior: 1943 c 73 s 1, part; 1937 c 187 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-4, part.]